Maine, session 132, LD2035.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §287-A, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 323, §15 and amended by PL
2011, c. 286, Pt. B, §5, is amended to read:
§287-A. Fees
The Director of the Office of Professional and Occupational Regulation within the
Department of Professional and Financial Regulation may establish by rule fees for
purposes authorized under this chapter in amounts that are reasonable and necessary for
their respective purposes, except that the fee for any one purpose may not exceed $200
$300 annually. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules pursuant
to Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter II‑A 2-A.
Page 1 - 132LR2815(04)